New York, session 2025-2026, S693.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 373 of the laws of 2020 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the town of Wallkill to adopt a hotel or 3 motel tax of up to 5%, as amended by chapter 330 of the laws of 2023, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed September 1, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02221-01-5